Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.550

Contract to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, credentials, and documents in conjunction with license applications.

The director may contract with the federal internal revenue service, or other appropriate federal agency, to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, or other federal credentials or documents, at specified offices and locations of the agency in conjunction with any application for state licenses under chapter 19.02 RCW.

[ 1997 c 51 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1997 c 51: See note following RCW 19.02.300.